Florida, session 2026, HB271.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 624.4094, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
624.4094 Bail bond premiums.—
(1) The Legislature finds that a significant portion of
bail bond premiums is retained by the licensed bail bond agents
or appointed managing general agents. For purposes of reporting
in financial statements required to be filed with the office
pursuant to s. 624.424, direct written premiums for bail bonds
by a domestic, foreign, or alien insurer doing business in this
state shall be reported net of any amounts retained by licensed
bail bond agents or appointed managing general agents. However,
in no case shall the direct written premiums for bail bonds be
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb271 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 271 2026 Legislature
less than 6.5 percent of the total consideration received by the
agent for all bail bonds written by the agent. This subsection
also applies to any determination of compliance with s.
624.4095.
(2) Premiums assumed by a domestic, foreign, or alien
insurer shall be reported consistent with subsections (1) and
(4) for purposes of filing financial statements with the office.
(3) Each domestic, foreign, or alien bail bond insurer
shall keep complete and accurate records of the total
consideration paid for all bail bonds written by such insurer.
(4) Each domestic, foreign, or alien bail bond insurer
shall disclose the following information in the notes to the
financial statement in the insurer's annual statement filed with
the office.
(a) The gross bail bond premiums written in each state by
agents for the company.
(b) The amount of premium taxes incurred by the company in
each state.
(c) Total consideration withheld by agents and not
reported as an expense by the insurer in financial statements
filed with the office.
(d) The amount of bail bond premium included on the surety
line of the annual statement filed with the office.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb271 -00-er